Arkansas, session 2025, HB1968.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 14-164-333(a)(2)(B), concerning local sales
and use taxes for capital improvement bonds, is amended to read as follows:
(B) The tax levied in this subchapter on new and used
motor vehicles shall be collected by the secretary directly from the
purchaser in the manner prescribed in § 26-52-510.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 26-52-510(a)(1) and (2), as affirmed by
Referred Act 19 of 1958 and concerning the payment of sales tax on the sale
of new and used motor vehicles, trailers, or semitrailers, are amended to
read as follows:
*JLL326*
04-08-2025 09:57:42 JLL326

As Engrossed: H4/8/25 HB1968
(a)(1)(A) On or before the time for registration as prescribed by §
27-14-903(a), a consumer shall pay to the Secretary of the Department of
Finance and Administration the tax levied by this chapter and all other gross
receipts taxes levied by the state with respect to the sale by a person other
than a dealer of a new or used motor vehicle, trailer, or semitrailer
required to be licensed in this state, instead of the taxes being collected
by the dealer or seller.
(B) The tax levied by this chapter and all other gross
receipts taxes levied by the state with respect to the sale by a dealer of a
new or used motor vehicle, trailer, or semitrailer required to be licensed in
this state shall be collected at the time of the sale.
(2) The secretary shall require the payment of the taxes due
under subdivision (a)(1)(A) of this section at the time of registration
before issuing a license for the new or used motor vehicle, trailer, or
semitrailer.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 26-52-510(b)(1)(C), as affirmed by Referred
Act 19 of 1958 and concerning the payment of sales tax on the sale of new and
used motor vehicles, trailers, or semitrailers, is amended to read as
follows:
(C)(i)(a) When a used motor vehicle, trailer, or
semitrailer is sold by a consumer, rather than traded-in as a credit or part
payment on the sale of a new or used motor vehicle, trailer, or semitrailer,
and the consumer subsequently purchases a new or used vehicle, trailer, or
semitrailer of greater value within sixty (60) days of the sale, the tax
levied by this chapter and all other gross receipts taxes levied by the state
shall be paid on the net difference between the total consideration for the
new or used vehicle, trailer, or semitrailer purchased subsequently and the
amount received from the sale of the used vehicle, trailer, or semitrailer
sold in lieu of a trade-in.
(b) If the subsequent purchase of the new or
used motor vehicle, trailer, or semitrailer is from a dealer, the consumer:
(1) Shall pay the tax due on the total
consideration for the new or used motor vehicle, trailer or semitrailer
without taking the deduction provided under subdivision (b)(1)(C)(i)(a) of
this section; and
04-08-2025 09:57:42 JLL326

As Engrossed: H4/8/25 HB1968
(2) May claim the deduction provided
under subdivision (b)(1)(C)(i)(a) of this section using the process
established under subdivision (b)(1)(C)(ii) of this section.
(ii)(a) Upon registration of the new or used motor
vehicle, a consumer claiming the deduction provided by subdivision
(b)(1)(C)(i) (b)(1)(C)(i)(a) of this section shall: provide
(1) Provide a bill of sale signed
by all parties to the transaction which that reflects the total consideration
paid to the seller for the vehicle; and
(2) If the new or used motor
vehicle was purchased from a dealer, file a claim for a rebate of the amount
subject to the deduction provided by subdivision (b)(1)(C)(i)(a) of this
section.
(b) A copy of the bill of sale and the claim
for a rebate, if any, shall be deposited with the revenue office at the time
of registration of the new or used motor vehicle.
(c) The deduction provided by this section
shall not be allowed unless the taxpayer claiming the deduction provides a
copy of a bill of sale signed by all parties to the transaction which
reflects the total consideration paid to the seller for the vehicle.
(iii) If the taxpayer claiming the deduction
provided in this section fails to provide a bill of sale signed by all
parties to the transaction which that reflects the total consideration paid
to the seller for the vehicle, tax shall be due on the total consideration
paid for the new or used vehicle, trailer, or semitrailer without any
deduction for the value of the item sold the taxpayer is not eligible to
claim the deduction provided in this section.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 26-52-510(f)(1)(B)(ii), as affirmed by
Referred Act 19 of 1958 and concerning the payment of sales tax on the sale
of a motor vehicle from the original franchise dealer to an entity other than
a franchise dealer of the same make of vehicle, is amended to read as
follows:
(ii) The vehicle shall be considered a used motor
vehicle which shall be registered and titled, and tax shall be paid at the
time of registration the sale.
04-08-2025 09:57:42 JLL326

As Engrossed: H4/8/25 HB1968

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 26-52-523(c)(3), concerning the credit or
rebate on local sales and use tax, is amended to read as follows:
(3) If a rebate would be due under this section as a result of
the purchase of a travel trailer and if the gross receipts or compensating
use tax on the travel trailer is collected: directly
(A) Directly from the purchaser by the Department of
Finance and Administration under § 26-52-510 or § 26-53-126, then the
department shall collect only the amount of tax due less the amount to which
the purchaser would be entitled under the rebate provisions of this section;
or
(B) From the purchaser at the point of sale under § 26-52-
510, then the purchaser shall file a claim for a rebate as provided under §
26-52-510.

SECTION 6. Arkansas Code § 26-74-213(b)(1), concerning rebates of
county sales and use tax for capital improvements, is amended to read as
follows:
(b)(1) If a rebate would be due pursuant to the provisions of this
subchapter as a result of the purchase of a new or used motor vehicle: and if
(A) If the tax on the new or used motor vehicle is
collected directly from the purchaser pursuant to the provisions of under §
26-52-510, then the Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration
shall collect only the amount of tax due less the amount to which the
purchaser would be entitled under the rebate provisions of this subchapter;
or
(B) If the tax on the new or used motor vehicle is
collected from the purchaser at the point of sale under § 26-52-510, then the
purchaser shall file a claim for a rebate as provided under § 26-52-510.

SECTION 7. Arkansas Code § 26-74-408(b)(1), concerning rebates of
county sales and use tax for capital improvements, is amended to read as
follows:
(b)(1) When a rebate would be due pursuant to the provisions of under
this subchapter as a result of the purchase of a new or used motor vehicle:
and when
04-08-2025 09:57:42 JLL326

As Engrossed: H4/8/25 HB1968
(A) If the tax on the new or used motor vehicle is
collected directly from the purchaser pursuant to the provisions of under §
26-52-510, then the Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration
shall collect only the amount of tax due less the amount to which the
purchaser would be entitled under the rebate provisions of this subchapter;
or
(B) If the tax on the new or used motor vehicle is
collected from the purchaser at the point of sale under § 26-52-510, then the
purchaser shall file a claim for a rebate as provided under § 26-52-510.

SECTION 8. Arkansas Code § 26-75-212(b), concerning the collection of
the city sales and use tax for capital improvements, is amended to read as
follows:
(b) The tax levied in this subchapter on new and used motor vehicles
shall be collected by the Secretary of the Department of Finance and
Administration directly from the purchaser in the manner prescribed in § 26-
52-510.

SECTION 9. Arkansas Code § 26-82-108(b), concerning the collection of
the local sales and use tax under the Local Sales and Use Tax Economic
Development Project Funding Act, is amended to read as follows:
(b) The local sales and use tax levied under this chapter on new and
used motor vehicles shall be collected by the Secretary of the Department of
Finance and Administration directly from the purchaser under § 26-52-510.

SECTION 10. EFFECTIVE DATE. Sections 1–9 of this act are effective on
the first day of the calendar quarter following the effective date of this
act.

/s/Perry






04-08-2025 09:57:42 JLL326